hu_HU.aff
SFX W Y 208
SFX W   ö    õül          ö
SFX W   ö    õéül         ö
SFX W   ö    õéért        ö
SFX W   ö    õévé         ö
SFX W   ö    õével        ö
SFX W   ö    õétõl        ö
SFX W   ö    õét          ö
SFX W   ö    õérõl        ö
SFX W   ö    õért         ö
SFX W   ö    õére         ö
SFX W   ö    õénél        ö
SFX W   ö    õének        ö
SFX W   ö    õén          ö
SFX W   ö    õéig         ö
SFX W   ö    õéhez        ö
SFX W   ö    õébõl        ö
SFX W   ö    õében        ö
SFX W   ö    õébe         ö
SFX W   ö    õé           ö
SFX W   ö    õvé          ö
SFX W   ö    õvel         ö
SFX W   ö    õtõl         ö
SFX W   ö    õször        ö
SFX W   ö    õrõl         ö
SFX W   ö    õre          ö
SFX W   ö    õnél         ö
SFX W   ö    õnek         ö
SFX W   ö    õn           ö
SFX W   ö    õképpen      ö
SFX W   ö    õképp        ö
SFX W   ö    õként        ö
SFX W   ö    õkor         ö
SFX W   ö    õig          ö
SFX W   ö    õhöz         ö
SFX W   ö    õbõl         ö
SFX W   ö    õben         ö
SFX W   ö    õbe          ö
SFX W   zs   dzsé         dzs
SFX W   zs   dzsel        dzs
SFX W   z    ször         [^s]sz
SFX W   z    szé          [^s]sz
SFX W   z    szel         [^s]sz
SFX W   y    tyé          [^t]ty
SFX W   y    tyel         [^t]ty
SFX W   y    nyé          [^n]ny
SFX W   y    nyel         [^n]ny
SFX W   y    lyé          [^l]ly
SFX W   y    lyel         [^l]ly
SFX W   y    gyé          [^g]gy
SFX W   y    gyel         [^g]gy
SFX W   s    zsé          [^d]zs
SFX W   s    zsel         [^d]zs
SFX W   s    csé          [^c]cs
SFX W   s    csel         [^c]cs
SFX W   k    képpen       kk
SFX W   k    képp         kk
SFX W   k    ként         kk
SFX W   k    kor          kk
SFX W   e    évé          e
SFX W   e    ével         e
SFX W   0    ön           [^aeiuáéíóõúûü]
SFX W   0    õl           tt
SFX W   0    õl           rr
SFX W   0    õl           bb
SFX W   0    éül          [^ö]
SFX W   0    éért         [^ö]
SFX W   0    évé          [^ö]
SFX W   0    ével         [^ö]
SFX W   0    étõl         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ét           [^ö]
SFX W   0    érõl         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ért          [^ö]
SFX W   0    ére          [^ö]
SFX W   0    énél         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ének         [^ö]
SFX W   0    én           [^ö]
SFX W   0    él           nn
SFX W   0    éig          [^ö]
SFX W   0    éhez         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ébõl         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ében         [^ö]
SFX W   0    ébe          [^ö]
SFX W   0    é            tty
SFX W   0    é            tt
SFX W   0    é            ssz
SFX W   0    é            ss
SFX W   0    é            rr
SFX W   0    é            pp
SFX W   0    é            nny
SFX W   0    é            nn
SFX W   0    é            mm
SFX W   0    é            lly
SFX W   0    é            ll
SFX W   0    é            kk
SFX W   0    é            jj
SFX W   0    é            ggy
SFX W   0    é            gg
SFX W   0    é            ff
SFX W   0    é            dd
SFX W   0    é            ccs
SFX W   0    é            cc
SFX W   0    é            bb
SFX W   0    é            [^ö]
SFX W   0    zé           [^cst]z
SFX W   0    zel          [^cst]z
SFX W   0    vé           [iuváéíóõúûü]
SFX W   0    vé           [euéü]h
SFX W   0    vé           [^glnt]y
SFX W   0    vel          [iuváéíóõúûü]
SFX W   0    vel          [euéü]h
SFX W   0    vel          [^glnt]y
SFX W   0    tõl          [^t]t
SFX W   0    tõl          [^aeotö]
SFX W   0    té           th
SFX W   0    té           [^t]t
SFX W   0    tel          th
SFX W   0    tel          [^t]t
SFX W   0    t            [ln]y
SFX W   0    t            [jlnréóõû]
SFX W   0    sé           [^cstz]s
SFX W   0    ször         [^zö]
SFX W   0    ször         [^s]z
SFX W   0    szé          x
SFX W   0    szel         x
SFX W   0    sel          [^cstz]s
SFX W   0    rõl          [^r]r
SFX W   0    rõl          [^aeorö]
SFX W   0    ré           [^r]r
SFX W   0    rel          [^r]r
SFX W   0    re           [^r]r
SFX W   0    re           [^aeorö]
SFX W   0    pé           [^p]p
SFX W   0    pel          [^p]p
SFX W   0    nél          [^n]n
SFX W   0    nél          [^aenoö]
SFX W   0    né           [^n]n
SFX W   0    nel          [^n]n
SFX W   0    nek          [^n]n
SFX W   0    nek          [^aenoö]
SFX W   0    n            [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX W   0    mé           [^m]m
SFX W   0    mel          [^m]m
SFX W   0    lé           [^l]l
SFX W   0    lel          [^l]l
SFX W   0    képpen       [^kö]
SFX W   0    képpen       [^k]k
SFX W   0    képp         [^kö]
SFX W   0    képp         [^k]k
SFX W   0    ként         [^kö]
SFX W   0    ként         [^k]k
SFX W   0    ké           [^k]k
SFX W   0    kor          [^kö]
SFX W   0    kor          [^k]k
SFX W   0    kel          [^k]k
SFX W   0    jé           [^j]j
SFX W   0    jel          [^j]j
SFX W   0    ig           [^ö]
SFX W   0    höz          [^ö]
SFX W   0    hé           [^egtuéü]h
SFX W   0    hel          [^egtuéü]h
SFX W   0    gé           gh
SFX W   0    gé           [^g]g
SFX W   0    gel          gh
SFX W   0    gel          [^g]g
SFX W   0    fé           [^f]f
SFX W   0    fel          [^f]f
SFX W   0    en           bb
SFX W   0    el           tty
SFX W   0    el           tt
SFX W   0    el           ssz
SFX W   0    el           ss
SFX W   0    el           rr
SFX W   0    el           pp
SFX W   0    el           nny
SFX W   0    el           nn
SFX W   0    el           mm
SFX W   0    el           lly
SFX W   0    el           ll
SFX W   0    el           kk
SFX W   0    el           jj
SFX W   0    el           ggy
SFX W   0    el           gg
SFX W   0    el           ff
SFX W   0    el           dd
SFX W   0    el           ccs
SFX W   0    el           cc
SFX W   0    el           bb
SFX W   0    ek           nn
SFX W   0    e            rr
SFX W   0    e            bb
SFX W   0    dé           [^d]d
SFX W   0    del          [^d]d
SFX W   0    cé           [ct]z
SFX W   0    cé           [^c]c
SFX W   0    csé          ts
SFX W   0    csé          ch
SFX W   0    csel         ts
SFX W   0    csel         ch
SFX W   0    cel          [ct]z
SFX W   0    cel          [^c]c
SFX W   0    bõl          [^b]b
SFX W   0    bõl          [^abeoö]
SFX W   0    bé           [^b]b
SFX W   0    ben          [^b]b
SFX W   0    ben          [^abeoö]
SFX W   0    bel          [^b]b
SFX W   0    be           [^b]b
SFX W   0    be           [^abeoö]
