hu_HU.dic
üvöltõ/CDHWRMXY
ütköztetõ/CDHWRMXY
ürítgethetõ/CDHWRMX
ültethetõ/CDHWRMX
ügynökösködõ/CDHWRMXY
üdíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
útépítõ/CWMRymYcD
ötöltethetõ/CDHWRMX
ösztökéltethetõ/CDHWRMX
összegzõdött/CDHRWX
örökítõ/CDHWRMXY
öregbíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
öntözgettethetõ/CDHWRMX
önfejû/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
öltöztetõ/CDHWRMXY
ölelhetõ/CDHWRMX
öklöztethetõ/CDHWRMX
öblösíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
õröltetõ/CDHWRMXY
õrizgetendõ/CDHWRMX
ízesítõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
ígérkeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
észrevételeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
érzõdhetõ/CDHWRMX
érzelmeskedendõ/CDHWRMX
értéktelenítendõ/CDHWRMX
értesítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
érlelendõ/CDHWRMX
éretlenkedtethetõ/CDHWRMX
érdeklõ/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
énekelgetõ/CDHWRMXY
élveztetõ/CDHWRMXY
életösztön/CWMymTYcD
éledõ/CDHWRMXY
ékeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
égõvörös/CWMmTYcD
ébresztetendõ/CDHWRMX
áttetszõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
átengedõ/CWMRmYcD
állatszakértõ/CWMRymYcD
Ölyvös/CWMT
zümmögõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
zörömböltetõ/CDHWRMXY
zördíthetõ/CDHWRMX
zökkentetendõ/CDHWRMX
zsörtölõdött/CDHRWX
zsindelyezendõ/CDHWRMX
zizzenõ/CDHWRMXY
vörösödõ/CDHWRMXY
vízszintezõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
víkendeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
vésetendõ/CDHWRMX
vénülõ/CDHWRMXY
vékonypénzû/CWMRmYcD
véghezvihetõ/CDHWRMXY
vándorkõ/CWYc
vizesítendõ/CDHWRMX
visszaélõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMY
villanyrendõr/CWMymTYcD
vezényeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
vetíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
veteményezõ/CDHWRMXY
vesztegettethetõ/CDHWRMX
verítékezõ/CDHWRMXY
vermeltethetõ/CDHWRMX
vendégszeretõ/CDHWRM
vegyíthetõ/CDHWRMX
vasgyûrû/CWMRymYcD
tüszköltetõ/CDHWRMXY
tündökölt/CDHRWX
tûzögethetõ/CDHWRMX
tötyörészõ/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
törvényesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
töppesztethetõ/CDHWRMX
tömetõ/CDHWRMXY
többszöröztethetõ/CDHWRMX
térítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
ténylegesítõ/CDHWRMXY
továbbélhetõ/CDHWRM
tetézhetõ/CDHWRMX
terültethetõ/CDHWRMX
termelõdõ/CDHWRMXY
terelgetendõ/CDHWRMX
telítõ/CDHWRMXY
tekerõzhetõ/CDHWRMX
tagdíjfizetõ/CDHWRM
sültethetõ/CDHWRMX
sötétedõ/CDHWRMXY
sérelmezõ/CDHWRMXY
szükségelhetõ/CDHWRMX
szöszölt/CDHRWX
szögeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
színtelenedõ/CDHWRMXY
szélesítendõ/CDHWRMX
számûzhetõ/CDHWRMX
szigetelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
szeretkezõ/CDHWRMXY
szentségtelenítõ/CDHWRMXY
szeméremsértõ/CDHWRM
szemcsézhetõ/CDHWRMX
szeldelõ/CDHWRMXY
szegdelõ/CDHWRMXY
stírölendõ/CDHWRMX
sorköz/CWMymTYcD
sikerültethetõ/CDHWRMX
seprõ/CDHMWXRY
sekélyesítendõ/CDHWRMX
sarokmérõ/CWMRymYcD
röptettethetõ/CDHWRMX
révülõ/CDHWRMXY
rémülõ/CDHWRMXY
rubintkõ/CWYc
rezdülõ/CDHWRMXY
restelkedõ/CDHWRMXY
rendezõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
rejtjeleztetõ/CDHWRMXY
rebegõ/CDHWRMXY
pörösködhetõ/CDHWRMX
pöfékelõ/CDHWRMXY
pántlikafû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
pitykézõ/CDHWRMXY
pikkeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
perzseltetõ/CDHWRMXY
pengettetõ/CDHWRMXY
pecsételhetõ/CDHWRMX
okszerûsíthetõ/CDHWRMX
nõ/XCWMRmYcD
négyszögû/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
nyöszörögött/CDHRWX
nyelvgyötrõ/CWMRmYcD
nevesítendõ/CDHWRMX
neheztelendõ/CDHWRMX
nagylátószögû/CDHWRM
mûbõr/CWMymRTYcD
mérgesítõ/CDHWRMXY
mélyeszthetõ/CDHWRMX
mezteleníttetõ/CDHWRMXY
merényelhetõ/CDHWRMX
mentegettethetõ/CDHWRMX
melleszthetõ/CDHWRMX
megteremtõdõ/CDHWRMXY
megkatéterezõ/CDHWRMXY
megbuliztetõ/CDHWRMXY
lúdbõrztetõ/CDHWRMXY
lõporserpenyõ/CWMRymYcD
lépcsõzõ/CDHWRMXY
lávakõ/CWYc
licencelhetõ/CDHWRMX
letörülhetõ/CDHWRMX
lengetõ/CDHWRMXY
leledztetõ/CDHWRMXY
legelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
lebzseltethetõ/CDHWRMX
különcködött/CDHRWX
közéelegyíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
következõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kötvényeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
körzõ/CWMRmYcDCDHMWXRY
köpcösödött/CDHRWX
kölykezhetõ/CDHWRMX
köcsögösködhetõ/CDHWRMX
kézbesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
készülhetõ/CDHWRMX
kérleltetõ/CDHWRMXY
képzeltethetõ/CDHWRMX
kényszeríttetõ/CDHWRMXY
kégliztetõ/CDHWRMXY
krikettezõ/CDHWRMXY
kiérõ/CDHWRMY
kisstílû/CWMRmYcD
kileveledzõ/CDHWRMXY
kifedendõ/CDHWRMXCDHMWR
kibiceltethetõ/CDHWRMX
keveredõ/CDHWRMXY
kerítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kereszteztethetõ/CDHWRMX
kenegethetõ/CDHWRMX
keltegettethetõ/CDHWRMX
kedvezhetõ/CDHWRMX
kakilhetõ/CDHWRMX
jégmezõ/CWMRymYcD
jelentgetõ/CDHWRMXY
istenítõ/CDHWRMXY
intézhetõ/CDHWRMX
illegõ/CDHWRMXY
idõztethetõ/CDHWRMX
hülyítõ/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
hörgõ/CDHMWXRY
hívõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
háromkerekû/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
hintõ/CDHWRMXY
hessegettethetõ/CDHWRMX
hemzsegendõ/CDHWRMX
hegyû/CDHWRM
haszonlesõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
hajtû/CWMRymYcD
görgettetõ/CDHWRMXY
gönc/CWMmTYcD
gógyizhetõ/CDHWRMX
gyûrû/CWMRmYcD
gyöngülõ/CDHWRMXY
gyógyszereltetõ/CDHWRMXY
gyengélltethetõ/CDHWRMX
gerebenelõ/CDHWRMXY
füröszthetõ/CDHWRMX
függetlenítendõ/CDHWRMX
fölözõ/CDHWRMXY
födendõ/CDHWRMX
fényvetõ/CWMRymYcD
félhetõ/CDHWRMX
forróvérû/CDHWRM
figyelmeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
feslõdhetõ/CDHWRMX
fenetendõ/CDHWRMX
fellegesedtetõ/CDHWRMXY
felezõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
feküdött/CDHRWX
fejezõ/CDHWRMXY
feddendõ/CDHWRMX
evõeszköz/CWMymTYcD
esküdözõ/CDHWRMXY
erõdítõ/CDHWRMXY
eredményeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
engesztelõdött/CDHRWX
emelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
elõlegezhetõ/CDHWRMX
elviselõdtetõ/CDHWRMXY
elnököltetõ/CDHWRMXY
ellenezendõ/CDHWRMX
elfecserésztetõ/CDHWRMXY
elcsenevészesedõ/CDHWRMXY
egyszerûsödõ/CDHWRMXY
egyenetlenkedõ/CDHWRMXY
dünnyögtethetõ/CDHWRMX
dörzsölt/CDHRWXBDGVNMR
döngettethetõ/CDHWRMX
döcögtettetõ/CDHWRMXY
dzsesszesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
dezertõr/CWMmRYcD
címermezõ/CWMRymYcD
csúszóérintkezõs/CWMymTYcD
csöpögõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
csõdültethetõ/CDHWRMX
csiviteltethetõ/CDHWRMX
csicsergõ/CDHMWXRY
csereztetõ/CDHWRMXY
csengetendõ/CDHWRMX
csekélyelltethetõ/CDHWRMX
cicizõ/CDHWRMXY
bükk/CWMmRYcD
bömböltetõ/CDHWRMXY
bõszítendõ/CDHWRMX
bélyegeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
bridzselõ/CDHWRMXY
billegtetendõ/CDHWRMX
betegeskedõ/CDHWRMXY
beleértõdött/CDHRWX
bekakilhetõ/CDHWRMX
becsült/CDHRWX
babérfûz/CWYcCWMmTYcD
aljú/WDF
Vöckönd/CWMR
Tiszaszõllõs/CWMT
Sztrigyszentgyörgy/CWMT
Pusztamezõ/CWMR
Nagygörbõ/CWMR
Küllõ/CWMR
Kisfajkürt/CWMR
Iklándivölgy/CWMT
Gödrös/CWMT
Ferencvölgy/CWMT
Elyüs/CWMT
Cseterõc/CWMT
Buzásbesenyõ/CWMR
Assakürt/CWMR
